Utah statutes.
13-34-113.   Denial, suspension, or revocation of a certificate of registration or exemption certificate -- Limitations.

(1)  In accordance with Chapter 2, Division of Consumer Protection, and Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, the division may initiate proceedings to deny, suspend, or revoke a certificate of registration to operate a proprietary school under this chapter or an exemption certificate under Section 13-34-107.5 if:

(a)  the division finds that the order is in the public interest; and

(b) (i)  the registration statement, renewal statement, or application for an exemption certificate is incomplete, false, or misleading in any respect;

(ii)  the division determines that the educational credential associated with the proprietary school or accredited institution represents the undertaking or completion of educational achievement that has not been undertaken and earned; or

(iii)  the proprietary school, accredited institution, or an individual described in Subsection 13-34-107(2)(a)(ii)(B) has:

(A)  violated any provision of:

(I)  this chapter;

(II)  the rules made by the division pursuant to this chapter; or

(III)  a commitment made in a registration statement for a certificate of registration to operate the proprietary school or in an application for an exemption certificate;

(B)  caused or allowed to occur a violation of any provision of:

(I)  this chapter;

(II)  the rules made by the division pursuant to this chapter; or

(III)  a commitment made in a registration statement for a certificate of registration to operate the proprietary school;

(C)  been enjoined by any court, or is the subject of an administrative or judicial order issued in this or another state, if the injunction or order:

(I)  includes a finding or admission of fraud, breach of fiduciary duty, or material misrepresentation; or

(II)  was based on a finding of lack of integrity, truthfulness, or mental competence;

(D)  been convicted of a crime involving moral turpitude;

(E)  obtained or attempted to obtain a certificate of registration under this chapter by misrepresentation;

(F)  failed to timely file with the division any report required by:

(I)  this chapter; or

(II)  rules made by the division pursuant to this chapter;

(G)  failed to furnish information requested by the division; or

(H)  failed to pay an administrative fine imposed by the division in accordance with this chapter.

(2)  Division staff may place reasonable limits upon a proprietary school's continued certificate of registration to operate if:

(a)  there are serious concerns about the proprietary school's ability to provide the training in the manner approved by the division; and

(b)  limitation is warranted to protect the students' interests.

(3) (a)  The division may:

(i)  conduct a criminal background check on an individual described in Subsection 13-34-107(2)(a)(ii)(B); and

(ii)  require a proprietary school to provide to the division any information and to cover any costs necessary to conduct a criminal background check on an individual described in Subsection 13-34-107(2)(a)(ii)(B)(I) through (IV), including:

(A)  a fingerprint card in a form acceptable to the division;

(B)  consent to a criminal background check by the Utah Bureau of Criminal Identification and the Federal Bureau of Investigation;

(C)  the cost of a criminal background check; and

(D)  the cost of fingerprinting.

(b)  Money paid to the division for the cost of a criminal background check is nonlapsing.



Amended by Chapter 221, 2011 General Session

